Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies

Executive Order No. 29-1
(No. 38-79) [Transfer of Equipment and Property From Department of Public Safety to Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council.

WHEREAS, the Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council, pursuant to section 2 of No. 57 of the Public Acts of 1979, is no longer attached to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes, and

WHEREAS, the Department of Public Safety and the Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council, by its Executive-Director, have agreed on an inventory of equipment needed for training of criminal justice personnel at the Vermont Policy Academy at Pittsford,
Vermont,

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer all equipment and property of the State of Vermont presently utilized by the Council for training and training related purposes from the Department of Public
Safety to the Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council, effective July 1, 1979.

Dated August 30, 1979.

Executive Order No. 29-2
(No. 57-80) [Transfer of Property in Milton From Transportation Board to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Game.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Milton, County of Chittenden, and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation are no longer necessary
for State Highway purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Game, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the State Transportation Board to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department
of Fish and Game, for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Parcel A:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont by Sand Bar Bridge Company by Warranty Deed dated January 29, 1907 and recorded in Volume 23, Pages 912—915, of the Town of Milton Land Records, and being more particularly described
as follows:

All right, title and interest in and to a portion of the right-of-way of former U.S. Route #2 described as follows:

Beginning at a point 54 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 324 + 00 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Milton-South Hero F 028-1 (1);

thence 250 feet, more or less, easterly to a point 98 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 321 + 66 of said CL;

thence 68 feet, more or less, southerly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to a point 33 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 321 + 47 of said CL;

thence 62 feet, more or less, northwesterly and crossing said former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel to contain 0.195 acre, more or less, as shown on a plat of Highway Project Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3), which is attached hereto and made a part hereof.

Parcel C:

Being part of the same land and premises acquired by the Town of Milton for highway purposes by Court Decree of Chittenden County Court (1886 term) which was recorded October 24, 1890 in Milton Road Book, Pages 30-32, of the Town of Milton Land Records.
This portion of highway was taken into the State Highway System on April 1, 1931 as a result of Legislative Act 61 of 1931, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point 218 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 315 + 93 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Milton-South Hero F 028-1 (1);

thence 370 feet, more or less, southerly to a point 82 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 311 + 90 of said CL;

thence 367 feet, more or less, southerly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to a point 33 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 101 + 60 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project
Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3);

thence 384 feet, more or less, northerly and parallel to said CL and recrossing said former U.S. Route #2 to a point 33 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 312 + 16 of the aforesaid CL of said Highway Project;

thence 455 feet, more or less, northerly to a point 174 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate station 316 + 17 of said CL;

thence 51 feet, more or less, easterly and recrossing former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel to contain 0.722 acre, more or less, as shown on said attached plat.

Parcel D:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont by Sanford H. Thompson and Sadie M. Thompson by Warranty Deed dated April 22, 1930 and recorded in Volume 28, Pages 21 and 22, of the Town of Milton Land Records, and being more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a point 218 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 315 + 93 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Milton-South Hero F 028-1 (1);

thence 537 feet, more or less, southeasterly, southerly and southwesterly to a point 143 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 313 + 58 of said CL;

thence 15 feet, more or less, northwesterly to a point 130 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 313 + 65 of said CL;

thence 300 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 42 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 101 + 60 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3);

thence 312 feet, more or less, northerly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to a point 82 feet distant easterly radially from approximate survey station 311 + 90 of the aforesaid CL of said Highway Project;

thence 375 feet, more or less, northeasterly, northerly and northwesterly to a point 174 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 315 + 10 of said CL;

thence 103 feet, more or less, northerly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel to contain 0.890 acre, more or less, as shown on said attached plat.

Parcel E:

All right, title and interest in and to a portion of the right-of-way of former U.S. Route #2 which was taken into the State Highway System on April 1, 1931 (as a result of Legislative Act 61 of 1931,) and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the westerly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 66 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 125 + 64 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project
Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3);

thence 175 feet, more or less, southerly and parallel to said CL and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to a point in the easterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 66 feet distant easterly at right angle from approximate survey station 127 +
35 of said CL;

thence 1591 feet, more or less, southerly along said easterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to a point 25 feet distant easterly at right angle from approximate survey station 103 + 70 of the former U.S. Route #2 centerline (centerline
hereinafter referred to as CL) of said Highway Project;

thence 50 feet, more or less, westerly and crossing said former U.S. Route #2 to a point in the westerly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 25 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 103 + 70 of said former U.S.
Route #2 CL;

thence 1827 feet, more or less, northerly along said westerly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel to contain 1.931 acres, more or less, as shown on said attached plat.

Parcel F:

All right, title and interest in and to a portion of the right-of-way of former U.S. Route #2 which was taken into the State Highway System on April 1, 1931 as a result of Legislative Act 61 of 1931, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the northeasterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 25 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 83 + 75 of the former U.S. Route #2 centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as
CL) of Highway Project Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3);

thence 637 feet, more or less, southeasterly along said northeasterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to a point in the westerly right-of-way boundary of Relocated U.S. Route #2, 124 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate
survey station 163 + 80 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of said Highway Project;

thence 65 feet, more or less, southerly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to a point in the southwesterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 120 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 164 + 44 of said CL;

thence 679 feet, more or less, northwesterly along said southwesterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to a point 25 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 83 + 75 of the aforesaid former U.S. Route #2 CL;

thence 50 feet, more or less, northeasterly and crossing former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel contains 0.75 acre, more or less, as shown on said attached plat.

Parcel G:

Being part of the land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont by the following instruments:

Warranty Deed from Howard H. Mayville and Ann B. Mayville dated October 26, 1972, and recorded in Book 48, Pages 372 and 373;

Warranty Deed from Beatrice L. Bryant and Phillip P. Bryant, Jr. and Beatrice L. Bryant and Phillip P. Bryant, Sr. as Guardians of Crystal A. Bryant, Wendy J. Bryant, Paula E. Bryant and Phyllis P. Bryant, dated January 22, 1974, and recorded in Book
51, Pages 383-385;

Warranty Deed from Adelore Peter Gravelle and Ida May Gravelle dated April 13, 1979, and recorded in Book 67, Pages 152-155; all of the Town of Milton Land Records and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the westerly right-of-way boundary of Relocated U.S. Route #2, 120 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 164 + 44 of the established centerline (centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway
Project Milton-Colchester F 028-1 (3);

thence 120 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 80 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 165 + 60 of said CL;

thence 104 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 25 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate survey station 166 + 44 of said CL;

thence 58 feet, more or less, southeasterly and crossing the Relocated U.S. Route #2 CL to a point 25 feet distant easterly at right angle from approximate survey station 166 + 74 of said CL;

thence 90 feet, more or less, easterly to a point in the westerly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 115 feet distant easterly at right angle from approximate survey station 166 + 80 of said CL;

thence 148 feet, more or less, southerly along said westerly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to a point on the northerly bank of the Lamoille River, 123 feet distant easterly at right angle from approximate survey station 168 + 26 of said
CL;

thence 1,118 feet, more or less, northwesterly along the northerly bank of the Lamoille River to a point 60 feet distant southeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 83 + 75 of the former U.S. Route #2 centerline (centerline hereinafter
referred to as CL) of said Highway Project;

thence 35 feet, more or less, northeasterly to a point in the southwesterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2, 25 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 83 + 75 of said former U.S. Route #2 CL;

thence 679 feet, more or less, northeasterly along said southwesterly right-of-way boundary of former U.S. Route #2 to the point of beginning.

Said parcel contains 1.382 acres, more or less, as shown on said attached plat.

There is excepted and reserved from this conveyance an easement to cross said Parcel G for highway purposes, by bridging, together with an easement to construct, reconstruct, replace, repair, and maintain said bridge.

In the event facilities are constructed, maintained, or otherwise operated on the parcel of land herein conveyed for the accommodation of the traveling public or business users of any Federal-aid highway or any other member of the public in general (such
as eating, sleeping, rest and recreation), the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Game, agrees that it will not discriminate on the ground of race, color or national origin against such traveling public
or highway users or others in their access to and use of the facilities and services so constructed, maintained or otherwise operated, and that it shall construct, maintain and operate such facilities and services in compliance
with all other requirements imposed pursuant to Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Transportation, Subtitle A, Office of the Secretary of Transportation, Part 21 (49 C.F.R., Part 21) and as said Regulations may be amended.

Dated December 5, 1980.

Executive Order No. 29-3
(No. 58-81) [Transfer of Property in Highgate From Agency of Environmental Conservation to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land hereinafter described and located in the town of Highgate, County of Franklin and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, and is necessary for
Agency of Transportation purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the transfer of said hereinafter described land for the purpose of providing access for A. N. Deringer, Incorporated in common with others;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Environmental Conservation, to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation for the
aforesaid purpose the following described land, to wit:

Being a portion of the same land and premises that was transferred from the Department of Highways to the Department of Forest and Parks by Executive Order #8-73, dated May 9, 1973 and recorded June 7, 1973 in Book 59, Page 15 in the office of the Clerk
of the Town of Highgate.

Reference is hereby made to the above mentioned conveyance and records thereof and to the following instrument of conveyance in aid of a more complete description and further chain of title.

Quit-Claim Deed dated March 30, 1968 and recorded in Book 53, Page 190 of the aforesaid Town of Highgate Land Records, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point 312 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 952 + 05 of the established Baseline (Baseline hereinafter referred to as BL) of Highway Project Highgate I 89-3 (6);

thence 85 feet, more or less, northwesterly to a point 300 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 952 + 85 of said BL;

thence 264 feet, more or less, northerly to a point 410 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 955 + 25 of said BL;

thence 50 feet, more or less, easterly to a point 365 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 955 + 45 of said BL;

thence 284 feet, more or less, southerly to a point 250 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 952 + 85 of said BL;

thence 40 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 255 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 952 + 45 of said BL;

thence 80 feet, more or less, westerly to the point of beginning.

Said parcel of land is shown on a plat entitled “State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, Town of Highgate”, and dated January 19, 1981, which plat is attached hereto and made a part hereof.

Dated March 4, 1981.

Executive Order No. 29-4
(No. 63-81) [Transfer of a Portion of Chimney Point State Park Land and Premises From Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Division for Historic Preservation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands and premises located in the Town of Addison, County of Addison, and State of Vermont owned by the State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests,
Parks and Recreation have become and are no longer necessary for purposes of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Division for Historic Preservation desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes,

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Development and Community
Affairs, Division of Historic Preservation for its purposes, a portion of the Chimney Point State Park land and premises described as follows, to wit:

Beginning at the south corner of the land deeded by Millard F. Barnes and Mary H. A. Barnes to the Lake Champlain Bridge Commission and Interstate Commission by Warranty Deed dated September 5, 1928 and recorded in Volume 25 Page 120 of the Addison Land
Records.

Said point being the low water mark of Lake Champlain and easterly at right angles 45 feet from the centerline of the Lake Champlain Bridge crossing from Chimney Point in Addison, Vermont to Crown Point, New York;

thence on a true bearing of N 29° 23´ E 980 feet to a concrete monument 45 feet at right angles from the centerline of the Lake Champlain bridge extended;

thence on a true bearing of N 12° 02´ W about 29 feet to the centerline of the highway which is Vermont Route #17;

thence easterly along the centerline of Vermont Route #17 309.5 feet to a point which bears N 40° E (magnetic 1981) 51.7 feet from a one inch iron pipe standing in an old wire fence;

thence S 40° W (magnetic 1981) 51.7 feet to said iron pipe;

thence continuing S 40° W across the meadow 519.04 feet to one inch iron pipe standing between the beach and the meadow;

thence continuing S 40° W across the beach at least 126 feet to the low water mark of Lake Champlain;

thence westerly along the low water mark of Lake Champlain to the place of beginning containing 4.6 acres more or less.

Included in this conveyance is the old tavern building, barn, small house, sheds and all other improvements.

Included herein is the right to use the land deeded to the Lake Champlain Bridge Commission and Interstate Commission by Millard F. and Mary H. A. Barnes, September 5, 1928. The conditions governing the use of this land are described in said deed as follows:

“The said Barnes and his successors and assigns (State of Vermont) shall have the right to use said land for his or their convenience and to prevent trespass thereon by others but such use and right shall not conflict with use or occupancy by said Bridge
Commission, its successors or assigns nor be contrary to any rule or regulation made or to be made by said Commission, its successors or assigns, adopted for the proper management, control or protection of said bridge.”

The Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation shall have the right of access to its remaining lands through the herein transferred property along and from the proposed roadway to be constructed by the Division of Historic Preservation from Vermont Route
#17. The width shall be 50 feet and the location acceptable to both parties.

Dated December 2, 1981.

Executive Order No. 29-5
(No. 63A-82) [Transfer of Land in South Hero From Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to Department of Fish and Game.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises in the Town of South Hero, County of Grand Isle, State of Vermont, owned by the State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks
and Recreation has become and is no longer necessary for state forest and park purposes; and

WHEREAS, the hereinafter described parcels are more suitable for public fishing access to Lake Champlain;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Fish and Game
for its purposes the following described land and premises to wit:

Parcel One:

All of the former Rutland Railway Corporation land in South Hero conveyed to the State of Vermont on March 3, 1965 which lies between railroad centerline stations 6946 + 44 and 6991 + 60.

Parcel Two:

All of the former Rutland Railroad Corporation in South Hero conveyed to the State of Vermont on March 3, 1965 which lies between railroad centerline stations 7004 + 82 and 7012 + 08.

Parcel Three:

All of the public right-of-way interests reserved unto the State of Vermont in its conveyance of former Rutland Railway Corporation land to John K. Lambert on July 24, 1978 as recorded in Volume 36, Pages 469 and 470 of the South Hero land records. Said
right-of-way lies between railroad centerline stations 6991 + 60 and 7004 + 82.

Meaning hereby to transfer all right, title and interest in the former Rutland Railway Corporation land lying between centerline survey station 6946 + 44, which is the north abutment of the former draw bridge on the causeway between Colchester and South
Hero, and centerline station 7012 + 08 which is the centerline of town highway 18 in said South Hero. Containing 6.7 acres.

The herein transferred property is shown on Rutland Railroad Co. Track Maps #V2-132 and #V2-133.

There is reserved from this transfer any rights that adjoining land owners may have to farm crossings or water lines, et cetera.

Dated March 4, 1982.

Executive Order No. 29-6
(No. 64-82) [Transfer of Land in Barton From Agency of Environmental Conservation to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Barton, County of Orleans and State of Vermont owned by the State of Vermont hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests,
Parks and Recreation and Agency of Environmental Conservation has become and is now no longer necessary for the Agency purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation has expressed a need for the land for State Highway purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont, I, Richard A. Snelling, do by this, my order, hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Environmental Conservation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation
for its purposes the following land and premises, to wit:

Being parts of the same land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont by Raymond A. McCoy by Warranty Deed dated November 25, 1953, recorded in Book 48, Page 361 of the Barton Land Records and more particularly described as follows:

Those parcels identified in Executive Order #8-69 dated June 20th, 1969 as S.P. #27A : Beginning at a point in the northeasterly boundary of the present highway, U.S. Route #5, 165 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station
36 + 50 of the established centerline of Highway Project Barton FI 33 (2);

thence 360 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said northeasterly highway boundary to a point 215 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 40 + 20 of said established centerline;

thence, 350 feet, more or less, westerly to a point in the believed property line between land of State of Vermont and land now or formerly owned by one Lord, 120 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 43 + 68 of said established
centerline;

thence 60 feet, more or less, northeasterly in said believed property line to a point 180 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 43 + 68 of said established centerline;

thence 157 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said believed property line to a point 180 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 45 + 25 of said established centerline;

thence 130 feet, more or less, southwesterly in said believed property line to a point in the northeasterly boundary of the present highway, U.S. Route #5, aforesaid, 49.5 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 45 + 25 of
said established centerline;

thence 410 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said highway boundary to a point in the believed property line between land of State of Vermont and land now or formerly of Jane Duke Estate, 49.5 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate
survey station 49 + 35 of said established centerline;

thence 150 feet, more or less, northeasterly in said believed property line to a point 200 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 49 + 35 of said established centerline;

thence 50 feet, more or less, southeasterly in said believed property line to a point 200 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 48 + 80 of said established centerline;

thence 130 feet, more or less, northeasterly in said believed property line to a point 330 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 48 + 80 of said established centerline;

thence 340 feet, more or less, northeasterly to a point 670 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 48 + 80 of said established centerline;

thence 1200 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 605 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 36 + 20 of said established centerline;

thence 440 feet, more or less, southwesterly to the point of beginning. Said parcel to contain 11.8 acres, more or less.

AND S.P. #27B:

Beginning at a point 200 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 58 + 40 of the established centerline of Highway Project Barton FI 33 (2):

thence 550 feet, more or less, northwesterly to a point in the easterly boundary of the present highway, U.S. Route #5, 64 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate survey station 63 + 82 of said established centerline;

thence 400 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said highway boundary to a point 140 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 68 + 85 of the said established centerline;

thence 425 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said highway boundary to a point 66 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 73 + 00 of said established centerline;

thence 400 feet, more or less, northerly in said highway boundary to a point 66 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 77 + 00 of said established centerline;

thence 480 feet, more or less, northeasterly to a point 510 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 78 + 70 of said established centerline;

thence 1550 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 1200 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 59 + 50 of said established centerline;

thence 1000 feet, more or less, southwesterly to the point of beginning. Said parcel to contain 43.0 acres, more or less.

Dated March 23, 1982.

Executive Order No. 29-7
(No. 68-82) [Transfer of Land From Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that for State Highway purposes in connection with Highway Project Burlington M 5000 (1), it is necessary to acquire a certain piece of land located in the City of South Burlington, County of Chittenden and State of Vermont, and presently
under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings;

WHEREAS, the State Transportation Board is charged with and has the responsibility for planning, constructing, and maintaining all such highway;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings, to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation
for highway purposes the following described land, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by General Properties, Inc. by Warranty Deed dated December 27, 1972 and recorded in Book 108, Pages 370-372 of the City of South Burlington Land Records and being more particularly
described as follows:

Being Parcel #18 consisting of 0.07 acre, more or less, land and rights therein, as shown on pages 41 and 42 of the plans of Highway Project Burlington M 5000 (1) as filed on the 9th day of August, 1982, in the office of the Clerk of the City of South
Burlington and on any revisions thereto subsequently filed therein.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights conveyed:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brushes, and debris,
in an additional area which contains 0.03 acre, more or less, and is located right of and between approximate survey stations 16 + 04 and 18 + 00 of the Ramp “A” centerline of said Highway Project.

In consideration for the above transfer, the Agency of Transportation is hereby ordered and directed to pay to the Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings, the sum of One and No/100 Dollars ($1.00).

Dated December 22, 1982.

Executive Order No. 29-8
(No. 70-83) [Transfer of Land From Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Historic Preservation Division, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that for State Highway purposes in connection with Highway Project New Haven HHS 019-3 (16), it is necessary to acquire a certain piece of land located in the Town of New Haven, County of Addison, and State of Vermont and presently
under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Historic Preservation Division;

WHEREAS, the State Transportation Board is charged with and has the responsibility for planning, constructing, and maintaining all such highway;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Historic Preservation Division, to the jurisdiction and control of
the Agency of Transportation for highway purposes the following described land, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to Historic Sites Division, Agency of Development and Community Affairs by Vermont Public Service Board by Executive Order #22, dated November 26, 1975, and recorded in Book 35, Pages 260-264, of the Town
of New Haven Land Records and being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcel #5 consisting of 0.15 acre, more or less, land as shown on page 10 of the plans of Highway Project New Haven HHS 019-3 (16) as filed on the 2nd day of December, 1982, in the office of the Clerk of New Haven.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Grantor herein to construct a drive right of and between approximate survey stations 228 + 10 and 289 + 35, of the established centerline of said Highway Project.

In consideration for the above transfer, the Agency of Transportation is hereby ordered and directed to pay to the Agency of Development and Community Affairs, Historic Preservation Division, the sum of One dollar and No/100 ($1.00).

Dated March 22, 1983.

Executive Order No. 29-9
(No. 72-83) [Transfer of Land and Premises in Town of Alburgh From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Forests and Parks.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Alburgh, County of Grand Isle, State of Vermont, owned by the State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation has become and is
no longer necessary for State Agency of Transportation purposes.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department
of Forests and Parks for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

All and the same land and premises conveyed to the Agency of Transportation (then known as the Highway Department), by Executive Order from the Department of Forests and Parks dated January 19, 1967 and as shown on the accompanying plat entitled State
of Vermont, Agency of Transportation to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Forests and Parks.

Excepting and reserving therefrom all existing highway rights-of-way that may be of record.

These lands and premises are subject to the following leases, as shown on the plat, between the State of Vermont, acting through the Agency of Transportation, and:

Alburgh Volunteer Fire Department, date of expiration December 14, 1984;

P. J. Medor, Inc., date of expiration April 15, 1985;

Village of Alburgh, date of expiration July 14, 1985;

Alburgh Volunteer Fire Department, date of expiration September 29, 1985;

Town of Alburgh, date of expiration December 31, 1985;

Town of Alburgh, date of expiration January 29, 1986;

Town of Alburgh, date of expiration July 14, 1991.

These lands and premises are also subject to any utility rights-of-way and easements of record.

Dated June 1, 1983.

Executive Order No. 29-10
(No. 73-83) [Transfer of Land in Town of Marshfield From Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that for State Highway purposes in connection with Highway Project Marshfield BRZ 1446 (10), it is necessary to acquire a certain piece of land located in the Town of Marshfield, County of Washington, and State of Vermont and presently
under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department;

WHEREAS, the State Transportation Board is charged with and has the responsibility for planning, constructing, and maintaining all such highways;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department, to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency
of Transportation for highway purposes the following described land, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department by Norman C. Dix and Sally M. Dix by Warranty Deed dated June 21, 1976 and recorded in Book 31, Page 307 of the Town of Marshfield
Land Records, and being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcel #2 consisting of 0.24 acre, more or less, land and rights therein, as shown on page 4 of the plans of Highway Project Marshfield BRZ 1446 (10) as filed on the 8th day of March, 1983, in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Marshfield.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Grantor herein, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, in an area which contains 0.11
acre, more or less, and is located left of and between approximate survey stations 20 + 82 of the established centerline and 23 + 23 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project.

An easement in an area of 0.01 acre, more or less, to change and maintain, if necessary, the channel of a certain stream of water known locally as Winooski River now running on lands of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department,
left of and between approximate survey stations 21 + 13 and 21 + 35 of the established centerline of said Highway Project.

An easement to construct and maintain a drainage ditch located between approximate survey stations 21 + 19 and 21 + 39 of the established centerline of said Highway Project and thereby the right to discharge water through said drainage ditch onto the
lands of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Game Department.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Grantor herein to construct a drive between a point left of approximate survey station 21 + 32 of the established centerline and a point left of approximate survey station
23 + 05 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project.

An easement to extend highway slopes and embankments in a total area of 0.02 acre, more or less, as shown on page 4 of the plans of said Highway Project.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The State of Vermont shall have the right to remove
all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

Dated June 10, 1983.